Utah statutes.
64-13-3.   Executive director.

(1)  The executive director shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of the Senate.

(2)  The executive director shall be experienced and knowledgeable in the field of corrections and shall have training in criminology and penology.

(3)  The governor shall establish the executive director's salary within the salary range fixed by the Legislature in Title 67, Chapter 22, State Officer Compensation.



Amended by Chapter 176, 2002 General Session

